Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 62A.65, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Guaranteed renewal. No individual health plan may be offered, sold, issued, or renewed to a Minnesota resident unless the health plan provides that the plan is guaranteed renewable at a premium rate that does not take into account the claims experience or any change in the health status of any covered person that occurred after the initial issuance of the health plan to the person. The premium rate upon renewal must also otherwise comply with this section. A health carrier is prohibited from refusing to renew a Minnesota resident's individual health plan unless: (1) the enrollee has failed to pay premiums in accordance with the health plan's terms, including any timeliness requirements; (2) the enrollee has performed an act or practice that constitutes fraud or made an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the health plan's terms; (3) the enrollee no longer lives in the area where the deleted text begin issuerdeleted text end new text begin health carriernew text end is authorized to operate; (4) a health carrier discontinues an individual health plan under subdivision 2a; or (5) a health carrier discontinues issuing new individual health plans and refuses to renew all of the health carrier's existing individual health plans issued in Minnesota as provided under subdivision 8. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 62A.65, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Discontinuing individual health plan. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end In order to discontinue a particular type of individual health plan in Minnesota for purposes of subdivision 2, clause (4), a health carrier must: deleted text begin (1) provide written notice to the commissioner that approves the individual health plan's policy forms and filings, in a form and manner approved by the commissioner, regarding the health carrier's intent to discontinue a particular type of individual health plan in Minnesota. The notice must be provided no later than May 1 of the year before the date the individual health plan intends to discontinue the particular type of individual health plan; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end provide written notice to each deleted text begin individualdeleted text end new text begin policyholdernew text end enrolled in the individual health plan no later than 90 days before the date the coverage is discontinued; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end offer to each individual covered by the individual health plan that the health carrier intends to discontinue the option to purchase on a guaranteed issue basis any other individual health plan currently offered by the health carrier for individuals in the individual market; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end act uniformly without regard to any health status factor of a covered individual or a dependent of a covered individual who may become eligible for coverage. deleted text begin (b) Subject to paragraph (d), the commissioner may disapprove a health carrier discontinuing a particular type of individual health plan within 60 days after receiving notice under paragraph (a) if the commissioner determines discontinuing the plan is not in Minnesota policyholders' best interest. When making the determination under this paragraph, the commissioner may consider the plan's enrollment size, the availability of comparable individual health plan options offered by the health carrier in Minnesota, or any other factor the commissioner deems relevant. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) A health carrier may appeal the commissioner's determination made under paragraph (b) to disapprove the health carrier's plan to discontinue a particular type of individual health plan in Minnesota. An appeal under this paragraph is subject to the contested case procedures under chapter 14 and must be made within 30 days of the date the commissioner makes a written determination under paragraph (b). deleted text end deleted text begin (d) A health carrier may discontinue an individual health plan without commissioner approval if the individual health plan is not a catastrophic or platinum-level health plan, as defined in United States Code, title 42, section 18022, and the plan: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) has fewer than 25 enrollees; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) is a grandfathered plan, as defined in section 62A.011, subdivision 1b. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.65, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin Exception for uniform modification of coverage. new text end new text begin (a) A health carrier may modify the health plan for a product, as defined under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 144.103, offered to an individual in the individual market if the modification is effective uniformly for all individuals with that product. A health carrier may modify the health plan for a product under this paragraph only at the time coverage is renewed. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of paragraph (a), modifications made uniformly and solely pursuant to applicable federal or state requirements are considered a uniform modification of coverage if the modification is: new text end new text begin (1) made within a reasonable time period after the federal or state requirement is imposed or modified; and new text end new text begin (2) directly related to the federal or state requirement that is imposed or modified. new text end new text begin (c) Other types of modifications made uniformly are considered a uniform modification of coverage if the health plan for the product in the individual market meets all of the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the product is offered by the same health carrier or, if the health carrier is a member of a controlled group, as described in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 147.106, paragraph (d)(4), another health carrier that is a member of the controlled group; new text end new text begin (2) the product is offered as the same product network type, which includes but is not limited to a health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, exclusive provider organization, point of service, or indemnity; new text end new text begin (3) the product continues to cover at least a majority of the same service area; new text end new text begin (4) within the product, each health plan has the same cost-sharing structure as before the modification, except for any variation in cost-sharing solely related to changes in cost and utilization of medical care or to maintain the same metal level, as defined under section 62K.06, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (5) the product provides the same covered benefits, except for any changes in benefits that cumulatively impact the plan-adjusted index rate, as described in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 156.80, paragraph (d)(2), for any health plan within the product within an allowable variation of plus or minus two percentage points, not including changes pursuant to applicable federal or state requirements. new text end